California, session 20252026, SB803.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14300 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:14300. Young adults participating in the corps program shall generally be engaged in projects that do any of the following:(a) Preserve, maintain, and enhance environmentally important lands and waters.(b) Accomplish useful and needed public works projects in both urban and rural areas.(c) Conserve, maintain, improve, and develop natural resources in both urban and rural areas.(d) Provide opportunities for public use of, or education in, the areas, projects, and resources described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).(e) Assist in emergency operations, such as natural disaster relief and the rescue of lost and injured persons.(f) Assist in fire prevention and suppression.(g) Promote or contribute to the conservation of energy and the development or enhancement of clean energy, climate resilience, or sustainable nature-based solutions.(h) Contribute toward making public facilities accessible to persons with disabilities.(i) Assist departments within the Natural Resources Agency in developing, rehabilitating, and restoring parklands, recreational facilities, and historical resources; restoring salmon and steelhead spawning, nursery, and rearing habitat; restoring and preserving wildlife habitat; and enhancing reforestation in both urban and rural areas.SEC. 2. Section 14307.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:14307.5. (a) The director shall establish a Green Collar Certification Program that provides corpsmembers participating in the corps with skills and education including, but not limited to, reducing carbon emissions in residential and nonresidential buildings, preparing communities for environmental disasters, and developing conservation infrastructure projects that stabilize shorelines and restore ecological habitats.(b) The director shall issue a Green Collar Certificate to a corpsmember who successfully completes the Green Collar Certification Program.(c) The Green Collar Certification Program shall prepare corpsmembers to enter the workforce, apply for an apprentice program, or pursue higher education.(d) In developing and administering the Green Collar Certification Program, to identify emerging workforce needs, particularly in renewable energy, environmental restoration, and disaster preparedness sectors the director shall collaborate with all of the following:(1) Local builders and contractors, including small businesses and minority-owned enterprises.(2) The Interagency Advisory Committee on Apprenticeship to establish pathways into registered apprenticeship programs.(3) Environmental organizations and conservation groups to provide field-based training.(4) Community colleges and vocational training centers to offer coursework and certification in relevant fields.(5) Labor unions and trade associations to facilitate entry into high-demand sectors.(e) (1) The director may authorize certified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5, to implement the Green Collar Certification Program, pursuant to guidelines established by the corps. The director shall collaborate with the community conservation corps in the development of the guidelines.(2) The development and adoption of program guidelines necessary to effectuate or implement the program pursuant to this section shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(f) (1) The director may apply for and accept grants or donations of funds from any public or private source that are provided for the specific purpose of purchasing, renting, or otherwise acquiring or obtaining necessary property, supplies, instruments, tools, equipment, and conveniences for the Green Collar Certification Program.(2) Any moneys received pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deposited into the Green Collar Certification Program Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code or any other law, all moneys deposited into the fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the director for purposes of paragraph (1). Only those grants or donations described in paragraph (1) may be deposited into the fund and General Fund moneys shall not be deposited into the fund.